Louisiana, session 2026, SB334.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:2575(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2575. Blighted or abandoned property; public health, housing, fire code, building
code, and certain other ordinance violations; administrative
adjudication; procedure; appeal; penalties
A.(1) Any municipality or parish may prescribe civil fines for blighted
property, abandoned property, or violation of public health, housing, fire code,
environmental, and historic district ordinances in the municipality or parish by
owners of immovable property, their agents, tenants, or representatives pursuant to
the procedures for administrative adjudication provided in this Chapter. For the
purposes of this Chapter, "housing violations" shall encompass only those conditions
in privately owned structures which are determined to constitute a threat or danger
to the public health, safety or welfare, to the environment, or a historic district. In
municipalities with a population of seventy thousand or more according to the latest
federal decennial census, the term "housing violation" as used in this Chapter shall
also encompass building codes, zoning, vegetation, and nuisance ordinances.
However, nothing in this Section shall be construed to affect activities which occur
on the premises of manufacturing facilities and which are regulated by Title 30 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2) For purposes of this Chapter, "blighted property" shall have the same
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 334 ENROLLED
meaning as provided in R.S. 33:1374(B), and "abandoned property" shall have the
same meaning as provided in R.S. 33:4720.59(D)(2).
(3) The procedures for administrative adjudication provided in this
Chapter also may be used for the enforcement of ordinances concerning
building codes, zoning, vegetation, nuisances, and licensing. Permits and such
other ordinances may be determined by the governing authority of the parish
or municipality.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.